Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.060

Referee's oath.

Unless the parties expressly waive the referee's oath, a referee appointed as prescribed in this chapter must, before entering upon an examination or taking testimony, subscribe and take an oath that he or she will faithfully and fairly discharge his or her duty upon the reference, and make a just and true report according to the best of his or her understanding. The oath must be returned to the judge with the report of the testimony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 152; 1893 c 133 s 6; RRS s 618.]